Utah statutes.
76-8-716.   Request for assistance from state and local law enforcement authorities.

If, in the judgment of the chief administrative officer of any school or institution of higher education, his agent, or representative, the police or security department of that institution lacks sufficient manpower to deal effectively with any condition of unrest existing or developing on a campus or facility of the institution, he may request assistance from state and local law enforcement authorities. All state and local law enforcement officers while rendering assistance shall serve in co-operation with the chief administrative officer of the institution or his agent or representative and without expense to the institution.

